District of Columbia statutes.
7-801

Prophylactic solution to be administered.

The Mayor may, upon the advice of the Commissioner of Public Health and pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to prevent and monitor the occurrence of ophthalmia in newborns. Unless the Mayor provides otherwise, each physician or nurse-midwife who delivers or otherwise assumes the initial care of a newborn shall immediately upon that delivery or assumption of care administer to each eye of the newborn a 1% solution of silver nitrate, an ophthalmic ointment containing either 1% tetracycline or 0.5% erythromycin, or another prophylactic approved by the Mayor.

History

Apr. 27, 1937, 50 Stat. 120, ch. 144, § 1
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-83, § 4(a), 32 DCR 7276

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-301.
1973 Ed., § 6-201.

Editor's Notes

Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.